District of Columbia statutes.
28:7-702

Savings clause.

A document of title issued or a bailment that arises before the effective date of this act and the rights, obligations, and interests flowing from that document or bailment are governed by any statute or other rule amended or repealed by this act as if the amendment or repeal had not occurred and may be terminated, completed, consummated, or enforced under that statute or other rule.

History

Apr. 27, 2013, D.C. Law 19-299, § 9, 60 DCR 2634

Uniform Commercial Code Comment

This Act will apply prospectively only to documents of title issued or bailments that arise after the effective date of the Act. To the extent that issues arise based upon documents of title or rights or obligations that arise prior to the effective date of this Act, prior law will apply to resolve those issues.